District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2404

Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division Fund.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 5, 36 DCR 4575
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 602, 50 DCR 5668

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-834.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 602 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) deposit of monies from the Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division Fund into the General Fund, see § 604 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 602 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) deposit of monies from the Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division Fund into the General Fund, see § 604 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2401.

Short title of subtitle A of title VI of Law 15-39: Section 601 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that subtitle A of title VI of the act may be cited as the Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division Fund Amendment Act of 2003.

Effective Dates

Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.

Editor's Notes

Section 604 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided: “Upon the effective date of this title, any monies that are in the Abandoned and Junk Vehicle Division Fund shall upon its dissolution be deposited into the General Fund.”